Maryland, session 2026, HB1510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
8–109.
(a) In carrying out the requirements of this title, the Department shall:
(6) (I) establish and maintain a plan for ongoing investment in
technology; AND
(II) REQUIRE ON ANY PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE OR
ONLINE PORTAL THAT THE DEPARTMENT USES TO FACILITATE THE SUBMISSION,
PROCESSING, OR PAYMENT OF BENEFITS, OR THE COLLECTION OF INFORMATION
FROM CLAIMANTS AND EMPLOYERS, THE USE OF MULTIFACTOR AUTHENTICATION
REQUIRING CLAIMANTS AND EMPLOYERS TO USE AT LEAST TWO FACTORS TO GAIN
ACCESS TO ANY ACCOUNT USED ON THE WEBSITE OR ONLINE PORTAL;
8–311.
(a) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Secretary shall submit to the
Governor an annual report on the administration and operation of this title during the
[previous] IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING fiscal year.
[(b)] (2) The annual report shall include:

HOUSE BILL 1510 3
[(1)] (I) a balance sheet for the Unemployment Insurance Fund;
[(2)] (II) a table that shows the amount of any benefit that was
ineffectively charged or not charged to the experience rating record of an employer;
[(3)] (III) the reason for not charging the amount of any benefit to the
experience rating record of an employer;
[(4)] (IV) by category of disqualification, the amount of any benefit that
was paid after a disqualification under Subtitle 10 of this title; and
[(5)] (V) any recommendation for an amendment to this title that the
Secretary considers proper.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE SECRETARY SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AN ANNUAL REPORT ON THE
FRAUD PREVENTION AND ENFORCEMENT EFFORTS UNDER THIS TITLE DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(2) THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF INELIGIBLE CLAIMANTS DETECTED BY A
REVIEW UNDER § 8–805.1 OF THIS TITLE AND AN ESTIMATED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF
SAVINGS DUE TO THE DETECTION THAT MAY BE DETERMINED USING:
1. THE NUMBER OF INELIGIBLE CLAIMS DETECTED;
2. THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF WEEKS CLAIMANTS
RECEIVED BENEFITS FOR THE REPORTING PERIOD; AND
3. THE AVERAGE WEEKLY BENEFIT DISTRIBUTED TO
CLAIMANTS DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD;
(II) THE NUMBER OF CLAIMANTS FOR WHOM THE SECRETARY
CONCLUDED A REVIEW REQUIRED UNDER § 8–805.1 OF THIS TITLE BUT INITIATED
THE PAYMENT OF BENEFITS DUE TO AN INABILITY TO ESTABLISH CONTACT WITH AN
EMPLOYER DURING THE REVIEW;
(III) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF BENEFITS PAID TO CLAIMANTS IN
VIOLATION OF § 8–1301 OF THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1510
(IV) FOR ALL IMPROPER PAYMENTS NOT RECOVERED DUE TO
FRAUD, A LIST OF THE FOUR PRIMARY REASONS WHY THE DEPARTMENT WAS
UNABLE TO RECOVER THE PAYMENTS; AND
(V) 1. THE NUMBER OF CASES OF SUSPECTED FRAUD
REFERRED TO LAW ENFORCEMENT FOR FURTHER INVESTIGATION AND POSSIBLE
PROSECUTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–1306(B) OF THIS TITLE; AND
2. THE AGENCIES TO WHICH THE CASES INCLUDED
UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM WERE REFERRED, WHEN THEY WERE REFERRED, AND
THE AMOUNT OF CLAIMED OR PAID BENEFITS IN EACH CASE.
(3) THE SECRETARY SHALL PUBLISH THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE.
8–805.1.
(A) WHEN FILING A CLAIM FOR BENEFITS, IF A CLAIMANT ENROLLS IN
DIRECT DEPOSIT AND PROVIDES BANK ACCOUNT INFORMATION THAT IS IDENTICAL
TO BANK ACCOUNT INFORMATION THAT HAS BEEN USED WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 6 MONTHS FOR AN EXISTING CLAIM FOR BENEFITS FOR A DIFFERENT
BENEFIT YEAR OR FOR A DIFFERENT CLAIMANT, THE SECRETARY SHALL REVIEW
THE PENDING CLAIM BY:
(1) CONTACTING BY TELEPHONE THE CLAIMANT WHO IS USING THE
BANK ACCOUNT FOR THE PENDING CLAIM;
(2) CONFIRMING THE CLAIMANT DID IN FACT SUBMIT THE CLAIM FOR
BENEFITS;
(3) ATTEMPTING TO CONTACT THE CLAIMANT’S FORMER EMPLOYER
BY TELEPHONE TO VERIFY THE CLAIMANT’S EMPLOYMENT STATUS; AND
(4) CONFIRMING THE CLAIM MEETS ALL OTHER ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS TITLE.
(B) WHEN FILING A CLAIM FOR BENEFITS, IF A CLAIMANT PROVIDES A
MAILING ADDRESS THAT IS IN USE FOR A DIFFERENT CLAIMANT WHOSE CLAIM IS
PENDING OR WHO IS ACTIVELY RECEIVING BENEFITS, THE SECRETARY SHALL
REVIEW THE CLAIMS AND CLAIMANTS INVOLVED BY:
(1) CONTACTING BY TELEPHONE THE CLAIMANTS FOR WHOM THE
MAILING ADDRESSES ARE IDENTICAL;

HOUSE BILL 1510 5
(2) ATTEMPTING TO CONTACT THE CLAIMANTS’ FORMER EMPLOYERS
BY TELEPHONE TO VERIFY THE CLAIMANTS’ EMPLOYMENT STATUS; AND
(3) CONFIRMING THE CLAIMS MEET ALL OTHER ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS TITLE.
(C) WHEN FILING A CLAIM FOR BENEFITS THROUGH AN ONLINE PORTAL OR
WEBSITE MADE AVAILABLE BY THE DEPARTMENT, IF, AT THE TIME OF FILING THE
INTERNET PROTOCOL ADDRESS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEVICE FROM WHICH THE
CLAIM IS FILED IS BASED OUTSIDE THE STATE OR IDENTICAL TO THE INTERNET
PROTOCOL ADDRESS ASSOCIATED WITH AN EXISTING CLAIM FILED FOR A
DIFFERENT CLAIMANT, THE SECRETARY SHALL CONDUCT A REVIEW BY:
(1) CONTACTING BY TELEPHONE EACH CLAIMANT WHO FILED THE
CLAIM IDENTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(2) ATTEMPTING TO CONTACT EACH CLAIMANT’S FORMER EMPLOYER
BY TELEPHONE TO VERIFY EACH CLAIMANT’S EMPLOYMENT STATUS; AND
(3) CONFIRMING THE CLAIM OR CLAIMS MEET ALL OTHER
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS TITLE.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
SECRETARY IDENTIFIES A CLAIM FOR WHICH A REVIEW IS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION, BENEFITS MAY NOT BE PAID TO A CLAIMANT WHOSE CLAIM IS UNDER
REVIEW UNTIL THE REVIEW IS COMPLETE.
(2) IF THE SECRETARY IS UNABLE TO REACH AN EMPLOYER FOR A
REVIEW REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION AND FRAUD IS OTHERWISE NOT
SUSPECTED, THE SECRETARY MAY CONCLUDE THE REVIEW AND ALLOW THE CLAIM
TO PROCEED.
(E) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
8–809.
(b) If the Secretary finds that a claimant knowingly made a false statement or
representation or knowingly failed to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase a benefit
or other payment under this title, in addition to disqualification of the claimant, the
Secretary may recover from the claimant:

HOUSE BILL 1510
(1) all benefits paid to the claimant for each week for which the false
statement or representation was made or for which the claimant failed to disclose a
material fact;
(2) a monetary penalty of [15%] 20% of all benefits paid to the claimant
for each week for which the false statement or representation was made or for which the
claimant failed to disclose a material fact; and
(3) interest of 1.5% per month on the amount of all benefits paid to the
claimant for each week for which the false statement or representation was made or for
which the claimant failed to disclose a material fact plus the amount of the monetary
penalty accruing from the date that the claimant is notified by the Secretary that the
claimant was not entitled to benefits received.
(e) The Secretary may recover an amount under subsection (b) of this section:
(1) in the manner provided in § 8–630 of this title for the collection of past
due contributions;
(2) through other reasonable means of collection, including those
[permitted] AUTHORIZED under:
(i) State law for the collection of debts owed to the State,
INCLUDING UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES FOR WITHHOLDING TAX REFUNDS; or
(ii) federal law; or
(3) if the deduction is made by another jurisdiction under an
intergovernmental agreement providing for the recovery of overpaid benefits, by deduction
from benefits for which the claimant is eligible in the future under the law of the
jurisdiction that made the deduction, excluding the monetary penalty assessed under
subsection (b)(2) of this section and interest due under subsection (b)(3) of this section.
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Secretary may
recover, under a governmental offset agreement, an overpayment of benefits paid to any
claimant under:
(1) the unemployment insurance law of another state; or
(2) a federal unemployment insurance benefit program.
8–901.1.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR
BENEFITS, WHEN FILING AN INITIAL CLAIM FOR BENEFITS, A CLAIMANT SHALL

HOUSE BILL 1510 7
INCLUDE IN THE INITIAL CLAIM ONE OF THE FOLLOWING FORMS OF
IDENTIFICATION:
(1) A DRIVER’S LICENSE;
(2) A STATE IDENTIFICATION CARD;
(3) A SOCIAL SECURITY CARD;
(4) A BIRTH CERTIFICATE;
(5) A PASSPORT;
(6) A MARRIAGE CERTIFICATE;
(7) A MILITARY IDENTIFICATION CARD;
(8) A VETERAN IDENTIFICATION CARD;
(9) A PROFESSIONAL LICENSE ISSUED BY A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(10) A PASSPORT CARD;
(11) A TRIBAL IDENTIFICATION CARD; OR
(12) A PILOT’S LICENSE.
(B) (1) IF A CLAIMANT FILES AN INITIAL CLAIM IN PERSON, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE A COPY OF THE IDENTIFICATION PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SECTION AND RETURN THE ORIGINAL TO THE CLAIMANT.
(2) IF A CLAIMANT FILES AN INITIAL CLAIM ONLINE, THE CLAIMANT
SHALL SUBMIT WITH THE INITIAL CLAIM A SCANNED COPY OF THE IDENTIFICATION
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
8–1010.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS IS
DISQUALIFIED FROM RECEIVING BENEFITS IF THE SECRETARY FINDS THAT:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL FAILED TO SUBMIT IDENTIFICATION AS
REQUIRED UNDER § 8–901.1 OF THIS TITLE WHEN FILING AN INITIAL CLAIM; OR

HOUSE BILL 1510
(2) THE IDENTITY OF THE CLAIMANT CANNOT BE VERIFIED BECAUSE
THE NAME OF THE CLAIMANT DOES NOT MATCH THE NAME ON THE IDENTIFICATION
SUBMITTED WITH THE INITIAL CLAIM.
(B) A DISQUALIFICATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BEGIN WITH THE
FIRST WEEK THE CLAIMANT WOULD OTHERWISE BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS
AND REMAIN IN EFFECT UNTIL THE CLAIMANT SUBMITS VALID IDENTIFICATION
THAT MATCHES THE NAME ON THE INITIAL CLAIM.
8–1011.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS IS
DISQUALIFIED FROM RECEIVING BENEFITS IF THE SECRETARY CONDUCTS A
REVIEW REQUIRED UNDER § 8–501.1 OF THIS TITLE THAT RESULTS IN A
DETERMINATION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL SHOULD BE DISQUALIFIED DUE TO
SUSPECTED FRAUD.
(B) A DISQUALIFICATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BEGIN WITH THE
FIRST WEEK THE CLAIMANT WAS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS AND
REMAIN IN EFFECT FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE BENEFIT YEAR.
8–1301.
A person, for that person or another, may not knowingly make a false statement or
false representation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact to receive or increase a
benefit or other payment under this title or an unemployment insurance law of another
state, the federal government, or a foreign government.
8–1302.
An employer, its officer or agent, or another person may not:
(1) knowingly make a false statement or false representation or knowingly
fail to disclose a material fact to:
(i) prevent or reduce the payment of a benefit to an individual who
is entitled to the benefit;
(ii) avoid becoming or remaining subject to this title; or
(iii) avoid or reduce any contribution or other payment that is
required from an employer under this title; or
(2) willfully fail or refuse to:

HOUSE BILL 1510 9
(i) make a contribution or other payment;
(ii) submit a report that is required under this title;
(iii) produce records that are required under this title; or
(iv) allow those records to be copied or inspected.
8–1305.
(a) Unless another penalty is provided by statute, a person who willfully violates
a provision of this title or a regulation adopted under this title is guilty of a misdemeanor
and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding
90 days or both.
(b) In addition to the penalty under subsection (a) of this section, a person who
violates § 8–1301 of this subtitle:
(1) shall make full restitution of the benefit unlawfully received and pay a
monetary penalty of [15%] 20% of the benefit unlawfully received, including interest at a
rate of 1.5% a month on the total amount of restitution plus the monetary penalty from the
date the Secretary notifies the person of the amount to be recovered; AND
(2) shall be disqualified from receiving benefits for any week of
unemployment, including the week in which a determination is made that the individual
filed a claim involving a false statement, false representation, or failure to disclose a
material fact, until 10 YEARS AFTER THE LATER OF THE DATE THAT:
(i) the Secretary determines that:
1. the benefit unlawfully received has been repaid in full; and
2. the monetary penalty of [15%] 20% and interest at a rate
of 1.5% a month on the total amount of benefit unlawfully received plus the monetary
penalty have been paid in full; or
(ii) the Secretary determines that:
1. in the Secretary’s sole discretion under § 8–809(f)(3) of this
title, the benefit unlawfully received and interest are uncollectible; and
2. the claimant has paid the [15%] 20% monetary penalty in
full[; and
(3) shall be disqualified from receiving benefits:

HOUSE BILL 1510
(i) if there were no other previous determinations made that the
individual violated § 8–1301 of this subtitle during the immediately preceding 4 benefit
years, for 1 year from the date on which a determination is made that the individual filed
a claim involving a false statement, false representation, or failure to disclose a material
fact;
(ii) if there were previous determinations made that the individual
violated § 8–1301 of this subtitle in only 1 of the immediately preceding 4 benefit years, for
2 years from the date on which a determination is made that the individual filed a claim
involving a false statement, false representation, or failure to disclose a material fact; and
(iii) if there were previous determinations made that the individual
violated § 8–1301 of this subtitle in more than 1 of the immediately preceding 4 benefit
years, for 3 years from the date on which a determination is made that the individual filed
a claim involving a false statement, false representation, or failure to disclose a material
fact].
8–1306.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FINAL DETERMINATION” MEANS THE
DETERMINATION IN A MATTER AFTER THE EXHAUSTION OF ALL ADMINISTRATIVE
APPEALS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) IF A FINAL DETERMINATION IS MADE THAT A PERSON HAS
COMMITTED A VIOLATION UNDER § 8–1301 OR § 8–1302(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE,
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE FINAL DETERMINATION IS MADE, THE SECRETARY
SHALL REFER THE MATTER TO THE APPROPRIATE FEDERAL, STATE, OR COUNTY
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FOR PROSECUTION.
(2) SUBJECT TO § 8–625(D)(1) OF THIS TITLE, WHEN REFERRING A
MATTER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE REFERRAL:
(I) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION ON RECORD OF THE
PERSON SUSPECTED OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REPORTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT OR IN THE DEPARTMENT’S POSSESSION RELATING TO THE
SUSPECTED VIOLATION.
(C) A prosecution under § 8–1301, § 8–1302, or § 8–1305(a) of this subtitle shall
be instituted within 3 years after the date on which the offense was committed.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
VIOLATES § 8–1301 OF THIS SUBTITLE WHILE CONCURRENTLY EMPLOYED BY A

HOUSE BILL 1510 11
GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR A CONTRACTOR OF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT AT THE TIME
THE FRAUDULENT CONDUCT LEADING TO A FINAL DETERMINATION WAS
COMMITTED.
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A FINAL DETERMINATION IS MADE, THE
SECRETARY SHALL NOTIFY THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYER OF THE FINAL
DETERMINATION.
(3) (I) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTIFICATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS STILL EMPLOYED, THE EMPLOYER SHALL
INITIATE PROCEEDINGS TO TERMINATE THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYMENT.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW OR
TERM OF A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT, A VIOLATION OF § 8–1301 OF
THIS SUBTITLE MADE BY A FINAL DETERMINATION IS CONSIDERED GROUNDS FOR
IMMEDIATE TERMINATION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3–302.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section,
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection, or in other law, the Central Collection Unit is
responsible for the collection of each delinquent account or other debt that is owed to the
State or any of its officials or units.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an
official or unit of the State government shall refer to the Central Collection Unit each debt
for which the Central Collection Unit has collection responsibility under this subsection
and may not settle the debt.
(b) Unless, with the approval of the Secretary, a unit of the State government
assigns the claim to the Central Collection Unit, the Central Collection Unit is not
responsible for and may not collect:
(3) any unemployment insurance contribution or overpayment, EXCEPT
FOR AN OVERPAYMENT CAUSED BY FRAUD;
Article – Tax – General
13–913.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for any debt not
excepted by law from the Central Collection Unit’s responsibilities under Title 3, Subtitle

HOUSE BILL 1510
3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article or otherwise, the Central Collection Unit
may:
(i) certify to the Comptroller the existence of any debt that has been
referred to it for collection by a State agency; and
(ii) request the Comptroller to withhold the sum certified from any
income tax refund to which a debtor is entitled.
(2) A debt may not be withheld if the State agency or the Central Collection
Unit has been advised by the Attorney General that the validity of the debt is legitimately
in dispute or an alternate means of collection is pending and believed to be adequate.
(b) (1) The Department of Budget and Management shall establish by
regulation those classes or categories of debts, including any minimum debt amount, that
may be referred to the Central Collection Unit for withholding.
(2) Subject to § 13–918 of this subtitle, if more than one State agency is
owed money by the same debtor, any amount withheld from an income tax refund shall be
applied in the order of referral of the debt by the State agencies.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the withholding of debt from
an income tax refund authorized by this part does not preclude use of any other remedy
provided by law for the collection of debts owed to the State and this part shall be liberally
construed to effectuate its purposes.
(2) This part shall be interpreted in a manner that does not deprive a
debtor of any rights or defenses that would be available to that debtor in defending against
a claim of setoff incident to a judicial proceeding.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.